Utah statutes.
17C-2-105.   Objections to urban renewal project area plan -- Owners'
alternative project area plan -- Election if 40% of property owners object.
(1)  At any time before the plan hearing, any person may file with the agency
a written statement of objections to the draft urban renewal project area
plan.
(2)  If the record owners of property of a majority of the private real
property included within the proposed urban renewal project area file a
written petition before or at the plan hearing, proposing an alternative
project area plan, the agency shall consider that proposed plan in conjunction
with the project area plan proposed by the agency.
(3) (a)  If the record property owners of at least 40% of the private land
area within the proposed urban renewal project area object in writing to the
draft project area plan before or at the plan hearing and do not withdraw
their objections, an agency may not approve the project area plan until
approved by voters within the boundaries of the agency in which the proposed
project area is located at an election as provided in Subsection (3)(b).
(b) (i)  Except as provided in this section, each election required under
Subsection (3)(a) shall comply with Title 20A, Election Code.
(ii)  An election under Subsection (3)(a) may be held on the same day and with
the same election officials as an election held by the community in which the
proposed project area is located.
(iii)  If a majority of those voting on the proposed project area plan vote in
favor of it, the project area plan shall be considered approved and the agency
shall confirm the approval by resolution.
(4)  If the record property owners of 2/3 of the private land area within the
proposed project area object in writing to the draft project area plan before
or at the plan hearing and do not withdraw their objections, the project area
plan may not be adopted and the agency may not reconsider the project area
plan for three years.
